Maine, session 132, LD17.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §3231, sub-§3, ¶A, as repealed and replaced by PL 1999, c.
583, §18, is amended to read:
A. The warden may appoint deputy wardens, subject to the Civil Service Law. A
deputy warden designated by the warden has the powers, duties, obligations and
liabilities of the warden when the warden is absent from the prison location or is unable
to perform the duties of the office.
Sec. 2. 34-A MRSA §4203, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 508, §7, is amended to read:
§4203. Director Warden
1. Chief administrative officer. The chief administrative officer of the facility is
called the director and the warden of the Maine State Prison, referred to in this subchapter
as "the warden." The warden is responsible to the commissioner.
2. Duties. In addition to other duties set out in this Title, the director warden has the
following duties.
A. The director warden shall exercise proper supervision over the employees, grounds,
buildings and equipment at the facility.
B. The director warden shall supervise and control the prisoners at the facility in
accordance with departmental rules.
3. Powers. In addition to other powers granted in this Title, the director may appoint
one assistant director, subject to the Civil Service Law; the assistant director has the
powers, duties, obligations and liabilities of the director when the director is absent or
unable to perform the director's duties.
Sec. 3. 34-A MRSA §4204, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 508, §7, is amended
to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0181(03)

2. Education. The director warden shall maintain suitable courses for academic and
career and technical education of the prisoners. The director warden shall maintain
necessary equipment and employ suitable qualified instructors as necessary to carry out the
objectives of the facility's programs.
Sec. 4. 34-A MRSA §4205, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 48, §2, is amended to read:
§4205. Employees of the facility
Employees of the facility have the same power as do deputy sheriffs in their respective
counties to search for and apprehend escapees from the facility when authorized to do so
by the director warden.
Page 2 - 132LR0181(03)